src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VerbDer_ONSET_И/І !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/Ig+Ger:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>{иі}г VerbEnd ; ! gerund (at the same time as the action)
!352 Pl
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/Ig+Ger+Pl:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>{иі}гъяс VERB_K ;
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/Ig+Ger+Pl+Ill:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>{иі}гъясӧ VERB_K ; !345
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/Ig+Ger+Pl+Ine:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>{иі}гъясын VERB_K ; !OKK:50
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/Ig+Ger+Pl+Ill+Use/NG+Err/Orth-e-not-oe:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>{иі}гъясэ VERB_K ; !345
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/Ig+Ger+Pl+Ill+PxSg1:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>{иі}гъясам VERB_K ;
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/Ig+Ger+Pl+Ill+PxSg2:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>{иі}гъясад VERB_K ;
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/Ig+Ger+Pl+Ill+PxSg3:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>{иі}гъясас VERB_K ;
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/Ig+Ger+Pl+Ill+PxPl1:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>{иі}гъясаным VERB_K ;
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/Ig+Ger+Pl+Ill+PxPl2:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>{иі}гъясаныд VERB_K ;
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/Ig+Ger+Pl+Ill+PxPl3:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>{иі}гъясаныс VERB_K ;
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/Ig+Ger+Pl+Ins:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>{иі}гъясӧн VERB_K ;! 2000:359 
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/Ig+Ger+Pl+Ins+Use/NG+Err/Orth-e-not-oe:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>{иі}гъясэн VERB_K ;! 2000:359 
                                           !And Marina 2011-10-05 no Px
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/Ig+Ger+Sg+Ill:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>{иі}гӧ VERB_K ;
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/Ig+Ger+Sg+Ill+Use/NG+Err/Orth-e-not-oe:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>{иі}ге VERB_K ;
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/Ig+Ger+Sg+Ill+PxSg1:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>{иі}гам VERB_K ;
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/Ig+Ger+Sg+Ill+PxSg2:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>{иі}гад VERB_K ;
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/Ig+Ger+Sg+Ill+PxSg3:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>{иі}гас VERB_K ;
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/Ig+Ger+Sg+Ill+PxPl1:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>{иі}ганым VERB_K ;
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/Ig+Ger+Sg+Ill+PxPl2:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>{иі}ганыд VERB_K ;
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/Ig+Ger+Sg+Ill+PxPl3:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>{иі}ганыс VERB_K ;
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/Ig+Ger+Sg+Ill+Use/NG+Err/Orth-e-not-oe:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>ыге VERB_K ;
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/Ig+Ger+Sg+Ill+PxSg1+Use/NG+Err/Dial:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>ыгам VERB_K ;
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/Ig+Ger+Sg+Ill+PxSg2+Use/NG+Err/Dial:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>ыгад VERB_K ;
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/Ig+Ger+Sg+Ill+PxSg3+Use/NG+Err/Dial:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>ыгас VERB_K ;
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/Ig+Ger+Sg+Ill+PxPl1+Use/NG+Err/Dial:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>ыганым VERB_K ;
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/Ig+Ger+Sg+Ill+PxPl2+Use/NG+Err/Dial:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>ыганыд VERB_K ;
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/Ig+Ger+Sg+Ill+PxPl3+Use/NG+Err/Dial:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>ыганыс VERB_K ;
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/Ig+Ger+Sg+Ins:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>{иі}гӧн PossessiveSuffixes_NoSg1 ; !Ӧнія коми кыв, 2000: 360
!351 Pl
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/Ig+Ger+Sg+Ins+Use/NG+Err/Orth-e-not-oe:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>{иі}ген PossessiveSuffixes_NoSg1 ; !2018-0129
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/IgonMoz+Ger:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>{иі}гӧн%>моз VERB_K ; !
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/IgonMoz+Ger+Use/NG+Err/Orth-e-not-oe:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>{иі}ген%>моз VERB_K ; !
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/IgMoz+Ger:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>{иі}гмоз PossessiveSuffixes_NoSg1 ; !371
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/IgSor+Ger:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>{иі}гсор VERB_K ;
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/IgSor+Ger+Ins:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>{иі}гсорӧн VERB_K ;
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/IgSor+Ger+Ins+Use/NG+Err/Orth-e-not-oe:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>{иі}гсорен VERB_K ;
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/IgTyr+Ger:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>{иі}гтыр VERB_K ;
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/IgTyrji+Ger:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>{иі}гтырйи PossessiveSuffixes_NoSg1 ; !374
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/IgDyrji+Ger:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>{иі}гдырйи PossessiveSuffixes_NoSg1 ; !something less common from as early as 1945
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/IgTyrja+Ger:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>{иі}гтыръя VERB_K ;
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/IgChozh+Ger:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>{иі}гчӧж PossessiveSuffixes_NoSg1 ; !377
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/IgChozh+Ger+Ins:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>{иі}гчӧжӧн VERB_K ; !

@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/IgChozh+Ger+Use/NG+Err/Orth-e-not-oe:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>{иі}гчеж PossessiveSuffixes_NoSg1 ; !377
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/IgChozh+Ger+Ins+Use/NG+Err/Orth-e-not-oe:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>{иі}гчежен VERB_K ; !
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/IgKosti+Ger:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>{иі}гкості PossessiveSuffixes_NoSg1 ; !352, 379
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/IgKosta+Ger:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>{иі}гкоста PossessiveSuffixes_NoSg1 ;
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/IgKezhlo+Ger:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>{иі}гкежлӧ VERB_K ; !393
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/IgKezhlo+Ger+Use/NG+Err/Dial:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>{иі}гкежлэ VERB_K ; !393

@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/IgKezhlo+Ger+PxSg1:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>{иі}гкежлам VERB_K ;
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/IgKezhlo+Ger+PxSg2:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>{иі}гкежлад VERB_K ;
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/IgKezhlo+Ger+PxSg3:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>{иі}гкежлас VERB_K ;
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/IgKezhlo+Ger+PxPl1:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>{иі}гкежланым VERB_K ;
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/IgKezhlo+Ger+PxPl2:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>{иі}гкежланыд VERB_K ;
@U.CONJ-GER.IG@+Der+Der/IgKezhlo+Ger+PxPl3:@U.CONJ-GER.IG@%>{иі}гкежланыс VERB_K ;


LEXICON VerbDer_ONSET_А !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
 VerbDer_ONSET_А/Я ;
LEXICON VerbDer_ONSET_А/Я !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+Der+Der/Ana+Adv:%>{ая}на VERB_K ;
@C.CONJ-INF@+Der+Der/Ana+N:@C.CONJ-INF@%>{ая}на N_ ; !20260901 юрыс век вӧвлі тыр быдсяма мӧвпъяснас коланаяснас и ковтӧмъяснас
+Der+Der/Anaa+Adv:%>{ая}наа VERB_K ; !Adding after attestation in Komi Grammar 2000: 381
+Der+Der/An+Der/moz+Ger:%>{ая}нмоз PossessiveSuffixes_NoSg1 ; !383

LEXICON VerbDer_ONSET_Я !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 VerbDer_ONSET_А/Я ;


LEXICON Verb_ynyDer
! verb-yny-to-verb
! The source stems have no stem vowel "ы", and therefore
! dervational suffixes come with an onset vowel

@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/ysht+Dimin:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ышт V_ШУНЫ ; !!кольмыштны
!+Der/ysht+Dimin+V:%>ышт  VerbConj ;
!+V+Der/ysht+Dimin+V+Inf:%>ыштны VERB_K ;
!@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@+Pl3@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@+V+Der/ysht+Dimin+V+ConNeg:@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@0@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@%>ыштны WordEnd ;
!@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@+V+Der/ysht+Dimin+V+ConNeg:@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@%>ышт WordEnd ;
!+V+Der/ysht+Dimin+V+Imprt+Sg2:%>ышт WordEnd ;

@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/ysht+Dimin+Der/ly:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ыштл V_ВОЛЫНЫ ;   !!??кольмыштлыны
!+V+Der/ysht+Dimin+V+Der/ly+V:%>ыштл  VerbConj ;
!+V+Der/ysht+Dimin+V+Der/ly+V+Inf:%>ыштлыны VERB_K ;
!@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@+Pl3@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@+V+Der/ysht+Dimin+V+Der/ly+V+ConNeg:@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@0@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@%>ыштлыны WordEnd ;
!@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@+V+Der/ysht+Dimin+V+Der/ly+V+ConNeg:@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@%>ыштл WordEnd ;
!+V+Der/ysht+Dimin+V+Der/ly+V+Imprt+Sg2:%>ыштл WordEnd ;

@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/ysht+Dimin+Der/lyvly:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ыштлывл V_ВОЛЫНЫ ;  !!??кольмыштлывлыны

@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/l:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ыл V_ШУНЫ ;  !!тшӧктывны

@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/lyvly:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ывл V_ВОЛЫНЫ ; !!тшӧктывлыны
!+V+Der/yvly+V:%>ывл VerbConj ; ! мынтывл - мынтывлан
!+V+Der/yvly+V+Inf:%>ывлыны VERB_K ;
!@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@+Pl3@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@+V+Der/yvly+V+ConNeg:@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@0@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@%>ывлыны WordEnd ;
!@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@+V+Der/yvly+V+ConNeg:@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@%>ывлы WordEnd ;
!+V+Der/yvly+V+Imprt+Sg2:%>ывлы WordEnd ;

@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/sjy:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ысь V_ЛЫДДЬЫНЫ ; !! вевттьысьыны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/sjy+Der/ysht+Dimin:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ысьышт V_ШУНЫ ; !!лэптысьыштны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/sjy+Der/ysht+Der/lyvly:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ысьыштлывл V_ВОЛЫНЫ ; !!?? вевттьысьыштлывлыны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/sjy+Der/ysht+Der/ly:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ысьыштл V_ВОЛЫНЫ ; !!лэптысьыштлыны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/sjy+Der/l:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ысьл V_ВОЛЫНЫ ; !!кутчысьлыны

@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/al:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ал V_ШУНЫ ; !!бергӧдчавны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/al+Der/ly:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@авл V_ВОЛЫНЫ ; !!бергӧдчавлыны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/al+Err/Dial+Der/ly:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ал^C2Vл V_ВОЛЫНЫ ; !!бергӧдчавлыны
@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/asj:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@ась V_ШУНЫ ; !! бертласьны


!<!-- This far 2012-01-19 -->

!@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der/ovt:@C.CONJ-INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@овт V_ШУНЫ ; !!пановтны


! Stray verb forms :-о


LEXICON VerbDer_V
! Page 346 in the Komi grammar
+Der+Der/mysjt+Ger:%>мысьт VERB_K ; ! gerund (after the action) !353
+Der+Der/mysj+Ger:%>мысь VERB_K ; ! !353
@U.CONJ-GER.VTER@+VTer:@U.CONJ-GER.VTER@%>тӧдз PossessiveSuffixes_NoSg1 ; !396
@U.CONJ-GER.VMON@+Der+Der/mwn:@U.CONJ-GER.VMON@%>мӧн PossessiveSuffixes_NoSg1 ; !399-403 REmove +Ger 2023-06-09
+Der+Der/mwnja:%>мӧнъя WordEnd ; !399-403 REmove +Ger 2023-06-09
@C.CONJ-INF@+Der+Der/Abe+A:@C.CONJ-INF@%>тӧм A_ ;
@C.CONJ-INF@+VAbess+Der+Der/lun+N:@C.CONJ-INF@%>тӧм%>лун N_ ;
@U.CONJ-GER.VCAR@+VCar:@U.CONJ-GER.VCAR@%>тӧг PossessiveSuffixes_NoSg1 ; ! 390
+Der+Car+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Ger:%>тӧгъя VERB_K ; !387
+Der+Car+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Ger:%>тӧга VERB_K ; !387
@U.CONJ-GER.VCARMoz@+Der+Car+Der/moz+Ger:@U.CONJ-GER.VCARMoz@%>тӧгмоз PossessiveSuffixes_NoSg1 ; !
+Der+Der/Adv+Adv:%>ӧм%>выв ADV_ ; !2091-06-03
+Der+Der/Adv+Adv+Err/Dial:%>ӧм%>выл^C2V ADV_ ; !2091-06-03
+Der+Der/Adv+Adv+Ela+PxSg2:%>ӧм%>выв%>сьыд ADV_ ; !2091-06-03
+Der+Der/Adv+Adv+Err/Dial+Ela+PxSg2:%>ӧм%>выл^C2V%>сьыд ADV_ ; !2091-06-03

@U.CONJ-GER.VTER@+Use/NG+Err/Orth-e-not-oe+VTer:@U.CONJ-GER.VTER@%>тэдз PossessiveSuffixes_NoSg1 ; !396
@U.CONJ-GER.VMON@+Use/NG+Err/Orth-e-not-oe+Der+Der/mwn:@U.CONJ-GER.VMON@%>мен PossessiveSuffixes_NoSg1 ; !399-403 REmove +Ger 2023-06-09
+Use/NG+Err/Orth-e-not-oe+Der+Der/mwnja:%>менъя WordEnd ; !399-403 REmove +Ger 2023-06-09
@C.CONJ-INF@+Use/NG+Err/Orth-e-not-oe+Der+Der/Abe+A:@C.CONJ-INF@%>тэм A_ ;
@U.CONJ-GER.VCAR@+Use/NG+Err/Orth-e-not-oe+VCar:@U.CONJ-GER.VCAR@%>тэг PossessiveSuffixes_NoSg1 ; ! 390
+Use/NG+Err/Orth-e-not-oe+Der+Car+Err/Orth+Ger:%>тэгъя VERB_K ; !387
+Use/NG+Err/Orth-e-not-oe+Der+Car+Err/Orth+Ger:%>тэга VERB_K ; !387
@U.CONJ-GER.VCARMoz@+Use/NG+Err/Orth-e-not-oe+Der+Car+Der/moz+Ger:@U.CONJ-GER.VCARMoz@%>тэгмоз PossessiveSuffixes_NoSg1 ; !



! 2012-02-11 This is a problem; олан-вӧлан, овны-вӧвны
!2018-10-21!LEXICON VerbPRT ! one verb, вӧвны 
!2018-10-21!+V: preterite ;
!2018-10-21!@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@+V+ConNeg+Pl3:@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@%>ны WordEnd ;
!2018-10-21!@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@+V+ConNeg:@U.CONJ-CONNEG.YES@ WordEnd ;

LEXICON EM !!≈ * **@CODE@** эм:эм. Ending in -ӧсь.
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@+Ind+Prs+Sg3:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@ WordEnd ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>ӧсь VERB_K ; ! Plural predicative ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth-e-not-oe+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>эсь VERB_K ; ! Plural predicative ;

LEXICON EMYSHT ! эмышт "is a little / are a few"
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@+Ind+Prs+Sg3:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@ WordEnd ;
@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@+Ind+Prs+Pl3:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-NX.PL@@U.CONJ-PX.3@ WordEnd ;
 
LEXICON GER ! 3 lexicalised +Ger forms.
+V+Ger: WordEnd ;

LEXICON VERB_K
@D.DECL-NX@ K ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
